District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act of 2012.”

History

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 101, 59 DCR 2542

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.